Utah statutes.
10-8-62.   Cemeteries -- Purchase and operation.
The city legislative body may:
(1)  purchase, hold, and pay for lands within or without the corporate limits
for the burial of the dead, and all necessary grounds for hospitals;
(2)  have and exercise police jurisdiction over those lands, and over any
cemetery used by the inhabitants of the city;
(3)  survey, plat, map, fence, ornament, and otherwise improve, manage, and
operate public burial and cemetery grounds;
(4)  convey cemetery lots owned by the city, and pass ordinances for the
protection and governing of these grounds consistent with Title 8, Chapter 5,
Municipal Cemeteries;
(5)  contract for the care and improvement of cemeteries and cemetery lots,
and for any compensation for the care and improvement;
(6)  receive deposits for the care of lots and invest the deposits by
following the procedures and requirements of Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money
Management Act; and
(7)  pay the cost of the care from any proceeds from the investment.
